Nebraska, session 109, LB258.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 48-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
48-1203 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section
48-1203.01, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees a minimum
wage of:
(a) Nine dollars per hour through December 31, 2022;
(b) Ten dollars and fifty cents per hour on and after January 1, 2023,
through December 31, 2023;
(c) Twelve dollars per hour on and after January 1, 2024, through December
31, 2024;
(d) Thirteen dollars and fifty cents per hour on and after January 1,
2025, through December 31, 2025; and
(e) Fifteen dollars per hour on and after January 1, 2026, through
December 31, 2026.
(2) The minimum wage established in subdivision (1)(e) of this section
shall be increased on January 1, 2027, and on January 1 of successive years, by
one and three-quarters percent the increase in the cost of living. The increase
in the cost of living shall be measured by the percentage increase, if any, as
of August of the previous year over the level as of August of the year
preceding that year in the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U)
for the Midwest Region, or its successor index, as published by the U.S.
Department of Labor, or its successor agency, with the amount of the minimum
wage increase rounded up to the nearest multiple of five cents. No later than
October 15 of each year, commencing October 15, 2026, the Nebraska Department
of Labor shall calculate and publish the minimum wage rate that will take
effect the following January 1.
(3) For persons compensated by way of gratuities such as waitresses,
waiters, hotel bellhops, porters, and shoeshine persons, the employer shall pay
wages at the minimum rate of two dollars and thirteen cents per hour, plus all
gratuities given to them for services rendered. The sum of wages and gratuities
received by each person compensated by way of gratuities shall equal or exceed
the applicable minimum wage rate provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. In determining whether or not the individual is compensated by way of
gratuities, the burden of proof shall be upon the employer.
(4) Any employer employing student-learners as part of a bona fide
vocational training program shall pay such student-learners' wages at a rate of
at least seventy-five percent of the minimum wage rate which would otherwise be
applicable under this section.
(5)(a) An employer may pay a youth minimum wage of thirteen dollars and
fifty cents per hour to an employee who:
(i) Is at least fourteen years of age but younger than sixteen years of
age; and
(ii) Is not an emancipated minor.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2030, and on January 1 of every fifth year
thereafter, the youth minimum wage shall increase by one and one-half percent,
rounded to the nearest cent.
Sec. 2. Section 48-1203.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1203.01 (1) An employer may pay a new employee who is at least sixteen
years of age but younger than twenty years of age and who is not a seasonal or
migrant worker or an emancipated minor a training wage rate as described in
subsection (2) of this section of at least seventy-five percent of the federal
minimum wage for ninety days from the date the new employee was hired. An
employer may pay such new employee the training wage rate for an additional
ninety-day period while the new employee is participating in on-the-job
training which (a) (1) requires technical, personal, or other skills which are
necessary for his or her employment and (b) (2) is approved by the Commissioner
of Labor. No more than one-fourth of the total hours paid by the employer shall
be at the training wage rate.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the training wage rate shall be:
(a) Thirteen dollars and fifty cents per hour through December 31, 2026;
and
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2027, and on January 1 of each year
thereafter, the training wage rate shall increase by one and one-half percent,
rounded to the nearest cent.
-1-

LB258 LB258
2026 2026
(3) An employer shall not pay the training wage rate if the hours of any
other employee are reduced or if any other employee is laid off and the hours
or position to be filled by the new employee is substantially similar to the
hours or position of such other employee. An employer shall not dismiss or
reduce the hours of any employee with the intention of replacing such employee
or his or her hours with a new employee receiving the training wage rate.
Sec. 3. Original section 48-1203.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 48-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
are repealed.
-2-